Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ST. LOUIS COUNTY.new text end new text begin (a) $752,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to St. Louis County for the following all-terrain vehicle (ATV) trail projects: new text end new text begin (1) $75,000 for the Alborn Dirt Devils Club to engineer, permit, and acquire right-of-way for the County Road 166 to Ostman Road ATV trail project; new text end new text begin (2) $480,000 for the Ranger Snowmobile/ATV Club to engineer and construct the Seven Beavers ATV trail project; new text end new text begin (3) $100,000 for the Twig Area Trail Riders ATV Club to permit, design, engineer, and acquire right-of-way for the Lumberjack to Brookston ATV trail; and new text end new text begin (4) $97,000 for the Quad Cities ATV Club to engineer, survey, test, and design the club trailhead project. new text end new text begin (b) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CITY OF DULUTH.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the all-terrain vehicle account in the natural resources fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the city of Duluth and Head of the Lakes ATV Riders for a Duluth-area all-terrain vehicle route study to establish connectivity to and through the western part of the city of Duluth. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end